Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Article 5. Direct Offices of Foreign Banks.
§ 81-25-163.
Ratio of assets to liabilities.

Each foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall hold in the State of Mississippi currency, bonds, notes, debentures, drafts, bills of exchange or other evidences of indebtedness, including loan participation agreements or certificates, or other obligations payable in the United States or in United States funds or, with the prior approval of the commissioner, in funds freely convertible into United States funds, or such other assets as the commissioner shall by regulation or order permit, in an amount which shall bear such relationship as the commissioner shall by regulation or order prescribe to liabilities of such foreign bank appearing in the books, accounts or records of its Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency, including acceptances, but excluding amounts due and other liabilities to other offices, agencies or branches of, and wholly owned (except for a nominal number of directors’ shares) subsidiaries of, such foreign bank and such other liabilities as the commissioner shall determine.

The commissioner is specifically authorized, in implementing the provisions of this section, to:

Vary the ratio of assets to liabilities for Mississippi branches or Mississippi agencies, applicable under this section, of certain foreign banks as may be determined by the commissioner in his or her sole discretion to be necessary or desirable to reflect differences among such Mississippi branches or Mississippi agencies on account of:

The financial condition of Mississippi branch or agency office(s) of the foreign bank,

The financial condition of branch or agency offices of the same foreign bank located in other states,

General economic conditions prevalent in the home country of the parent foreign bank, or

The financial condition of the parent foreign bank itself, including but not limited to:

1. The financial condition of its branches and agencies located in other countries,

2. The financial condition of its affiliated bank and nonbank subsidiaries in the United States, and

3. The financial condition of the foreign bank on a worldwide consolidated basis or in its home country.

For the purposes of this section, the commissioner shall value marketable securities at principal amount or market value, whichever is lower, shall have the right to determine the value of any non-marketable bond, note, debenture, draft, bill of exchange, other evidence of indebtedness, including loan participation agreements or certificates, or of any other asset or obligation held or owed to the foreign bank or its Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency in Mississippi, and in determining the amount of assets for the purpose of computing the above ratio of assets to liabilities, shall have the power by regulation or order to exclude in whole or in part any particular asset.

If, by reason of the existence or the potential occurrence of unusual and extraordinary circumstances, the commissioner deems it necessary or desirable for the maintenance of a sound financial condition, the protection of depositors, creditors and the public interest, and to maintain public confidence in the business of a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency, he or she may, subject to such terms and conditions as he or she may prescribe, require such foreign bank to deposit the assets required to be held in the State of Mississippi pursuant to this section with such Mississippi banks, as the commissioner may designate.

The assets held to satisfy the assets to liabilities relationship, prescribed by the commissioner pursuant to this section, shall include obligations of any person for money borrowed from a foreign bank holding a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency only to the extent that the total of such obligations of any person are not more than ten percent (10%) of such assets considered for purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 55, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-165.
Closing of office.

No foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch, Mississippi state agency or Mississippi representative office shall close such office without filing an application with, and obtaining the prior approval of, the commissioner. An application by a foreign bank under this section shall be in such form and include such information as the commissioner shall establish by regulation or order.

If the commissioner finds, with respect to an application by a foreign bank under this section, that the closing of such office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage, the commissioner shall approve such application. If the commissioner finds otherwise, he or she shall deny the application.

Whenever an application by a foreign bank under this section has been approved and all conditions precedent to such closing have been fulfilled, such foreign bank may close such office and shall promptly thereafter surrender to the commissioner the license which authorized the foreign bank to maintain the office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 56, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-167.
Suspension or revocation of license.

If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds any of the following with respect to a foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency, he or she may issue an order suspending or revoking the license of such foreign bank:

That the foreign bank has violated any provision of this chapter or of any regulation or order issued under this chapter or any provision of any other applicable law, regulation or order;

That the foreign bank is transacting activities in the State of Mississippi in an unsafe or unsound manner or, in any case, is transacting activities elsewhere in an unsafe or unsound manner;

That the foreign bank or any one or more of its Mississippi state branches or Mississippi state agencies is in an unsafe or unsound condition;

That the foreign bank has ceased to operate any of its offices in the State of Mississippi without the prior approval of the commissioner in accordance with this chapter;

That the foreign bank is insolvent in that it has ceased to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business, it cannot pay its debts as they become due, or its liabilities exceed its assets;

That the foreign bank has suspended payment of its obligations, has made an assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or has admitted in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due;

That the foreign bank has applied for an adjudication of bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, or other relief under any foreign or domestic bankruptcy, reorganization, insolvency, or moratorium law, or that any person has applied for any such relief under such law against the foreign bank and the foreign bank has by any affirmative act approved of or consented to such action or such relief has been granted;

That a receiver, liquidator, or conservator has been appointed for the foreign bank or that any proceeding for such an appointment or any similar proceeding has been initiated in the country of the foreign bank’s organization;

That the existence of the foreign bank or the authority of the foreign bank to transact banking business under the laws of the country of the foreign bank’s organization has been suspended or terminated; or

That any fact or condition exists which, if it had existed at the time when the foreign bank applied for its license to transact business in the State of Mississippi, would have been grounds for denying such application.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 57, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-169.
Authority of of commissioner to suspend or revoke license.

If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 81-25-167 are true with respect to any foreign bank which is licensed to maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency and that it is necessary for the protection of the interests of creditors of the foreign bank’s business in the State of Mississippi or, in any case, for the protection of the public interest that the commissioner immediately suspend or revoke the license of the foreign bank, the commissioner may issue, without notice and hearing, an order suspending or revoking the license of the foreign bank for a period of up to ninety (90) days, pending investigation or hearing. The suspension or revocation of the license of the foreign bank by the commissioner may be appealed using the same procedure in which a suspension or revocation of a license of a state bank may be appealed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 58, eff from and after May 1, 1997.

§ 81-25-171.
Authority of commissioner to seize property.

If the commissioner finds that any of the factors set forth in Section 81-25-167 are true with respect to any foreign bank which is licensed to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency and that it is necessary for the protection of the interests of the creditors of such foreign bank’s business in the State of Mississippi or for the protection of the public interest that he or she take immediate possession of the property and business of the foreign bank, the commissioner may by order forthwith take possession of the property and business of the foreign bank in the State of Mississippi and retain possession until the foreign bank resumes business in the State of Mississippi or is finally liquidated. The foreign bank may, with the consent of the commissioner resume business in the State of Mississippi upon such conditions as the commissioner may prescribe by regulation or order.

At any time within ten (10) days after the commissioner has taken possession of the property and business of a foreign bank pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, such foreign bank may petition the Chancery Court of Hinds County, Mississippi, for an order requiring the commissioner to show cause why he or she should not be enjoined from continuing such possession. The court may, upon good cause being shown, direct the commissioner to refrain from further proceedings and to surrender such possession. The judgment of the court may be appealed by the commissioner or by the foreign bank in the manner provided by law for appeals from a judgment of Chancery Court of the State of Mississippi. Where the commissioner appeals the judgment of the court, such appeal shall operate as a stay of the judgment and a reinstatement of the commissioner’s possession. The commissioner shall not be required to post any bond.

Whenever the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a foreign bank pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, he or she shall conserve or liquidate the property and business of such foreign bank pursuant to the laws of the State of Mississippi as if the foreign bank were a Mississippi state bank, with absolute preference and priority given to the creditors of such foreign bank arising out of transactions with, and recorded on the books of, its Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency over the creditors of such foreign bank’s offices located outside the State of Mississippi.

When the commissioner has completed the liquidation of the property and business of a foreign bank, the commissioner shall transfer any remaining assets to such foreign bank in accordance with such orders as the court may issue. However, in case the foreign bank has an office in another state of the United States which is in liquidation and the assets of such office appear to be insufficient to pay in full the creditors of that office, the court shall order the commissioner to transfer to the liquidator of that office such amount of any such remaining assets as appears to be necessary to cover such insufficiency; if there are two (2) or more such offices and the amount of remaining assets is less than the aggregate amount of insufficiencies with respect to the offices, the court shall order the commissioner to distribute the remaining assets among the liquidators of such offices in such manner as the court finds equitable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 441, § 59, eff from and after May 1, 1997.